Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2192.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding an 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 article to read:ARTICLE XXVIII-JCOMMONWEALTH HOUSING COUNCILSection 2801-J. Scope of article. This article establishes the Commonwealth Housing Council.Section 2802-J. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Council." The Commonwealth Housing Council established under section 2803-J.Section 2803-J. Establishment of council. The Commonwealth Housing Council is established.Section 2804-J. Purpose of council.The council shall coordinate with executive departments and agencies regarding the Commonwealth's housing policies.Section 2805-J. Membership of council.The council shall consist of the following members:(1) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee.(2) The Secretary of Human Services or a designee.(3) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency or a designee.(4) The Secretary of the Budget or a designee.(5) A member of the Senate appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(6) A member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(7) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.20260HB2192PN2856 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) A member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(9) The mayor of a city of the first class or a designee with experience in housing.(10) The county executive of a county of the second class or a designee with experience in housing.(11) One member representing county government with experience in housing appointed by the Governor from a list of 16 individuals provided by the county commissioners or county executives of Adams, Berks, Centre, Cumberland, Dauphin, Fulton, Franklin, Huntingdon, Juniata, Lancaster, Lebanon, Mifflin, Perry, Snyder, Union and York Counties.(12) One member of county government with experience in housing appointed by the Governor from a list of 18 individuals provided by the county commissioners or county executives of Bradford, Carbon, Clinton, Columbia, Lackawanna, Luzerne, Lycoming, Monroe, Montour, Northumberland, Pike, Potter, Schuylkill, Sullivan, Susquehanna, Tioga, Wayne and Wyoming Counties.(13) One member of county government with experience in housing appointed by the Governor from a list of six individuals provided by the county commissioners or county executives of Bucks, Chester, Delaware, Lehigh, Montgomery and Northampton Counties.(14) One member of county government with experience in housing appointed by the Governor from a list of 13 individuals provided by the county commissioners or county executives of Armstrong, Cameron, Clarion, Clearfield, Crawford, Elk, Erie, Forest, Jefferson, McKean, Mercer, Venango and Warren Counties.20260HB2192PN2856 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) One member of county government with experience in housing appointed by the Governor from a list of 12 individuals provided by the county commissioners or county executives of Beaver, Bedford, Blair, Butler, Cambria, Fayette, Greene, Indiana, Lawrence, Somerset, Washington and Westmoreland Counties.Section 2806-J. Administration of council.(a) Organization.--The Governor shall select a member of the council to serve as chairperson. The members of the council shall select from among themselves any other officers as the council deems necessary.(b) Quorum.--A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum. A majority of the members of the council shall be necessary to take an action of the council. The number required for a majority of the members of the council under this subsection shall be reduced if there is a vacancy on the council.(c) Meetings.--The council shall hold its first meeting within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection. The council shall meet no less than once a quarter.(d) Initial appointments and vacancies.--(1) An appointing authority under section 2805-J shall appoint initial members to the council within 60 days of the effective date of this subsection.(2) A member of the council shall serve a term of three years and may be reappointed for no more than two consecutive terms.(3) A member of the council appointed under section 2805-J(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7) and (8) shall serve a term concurrent with the appointing authority.20260HB2192PN2856 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) If a vacancy occurs on the council, the designating or appointing authority shall fill the vacancy in accordance with section 2805-J.(e) Administrative support.--The Office of the Budget shall provide administrative services and staff to the council.(f) Compensation.--The members of the council shall not receive compensation for service on the council.(g) Cooperation.--Each executive department or agency shall cooperate with the council in fulfilling the council's duties under section 2807-J.Section 2807-J. Duties of council.(a) Housing strategies.--The council shall develop the Commonwealth's comprehensive housing strategy that may be used by executive departments or agencies.(b) Duties.--The council shall have the following duties:(1) Developing a unified set of housing-related goals and priorities that serve as a framework for executive departments or agencies in the development of housing plans.(2) Working in collaboration with executive departments or agencies to develop a uniform set of housing goals, benchmarks and priorities for this Commonwealth that coordinate and complement Federal and State funding to maximize the availability of housing throughout this Commonwealth.(3) Developing and updating a State plan no less than once every five years for the following purposes:(i) Preserving rental and homeownership affordable units.(ii) Building new affordable units.(iii) Building enough housing needed to meet demand 20260HB2192PN2856 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at all income levels.(iv) Building a broad range of housing types that can meet a broad range of housing needs.(v) Housing for the homeless, seniors, veterans, individuals with disabilities and other disadvantaged groups.(vi) Housing stability programs and services.(vii) Strategies for expanding access to housing.(4) Creating and maintaining a consolidated inventory and resource guide for housing programs and services provided by executive departments or agencies.(5) Implementing national best practices research that may be relevant to this Commonwealth and seeking to benchmark the Commonwealth's housing programs and outcomes against other states.(6) Conducting research or collecting data relating to the needs, demands and conditions of affordable and workforce housing and access to affordable and workforce housing.(7) Ensuring that the Commonwealth's comprehensive housing strategy is developed with the consideration for the needs of rural, suburban and urban areas in this Commonwealth and provides the greatest access to safe and affordable housing throughout this Commonwealth.(8) Recommending strategies for incentivizing local adoption of housing policies needed to meet housing demand and the goals outlined in the State plan.(9) Serving as a coordinating resource to ensure that executive departments or agencies are communicating and coordinating effectively in order to maximize the collective impact of their work regarding the Commonwealth's 20260HB2192PN2856 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 comprehensive housing strategy.(10) Working in collaboration with executive departments or agencies to advance the Commonwealth's comprehensive housing strategies.(11) Providing regular updates to the Governor, the executive departments or agencies and the General Assembly about the Commonwealth's long-term and short-term housing goals.(c) Access to work of council.--The council shall provide information about the council's work to the Governor and the General Assembly and post any relevant information, including the council's State plan under subsection (b)(3), on a publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2192PN2856 - 7 - 1234567891011121314